Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.340

Determination of appropriate bargaining units—Unfair labor practices provisions applicable to chapter.

(1) With respect to collective bargaining as authorized by RCW 41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130, the public employment relations commission created by chapter 41.58 RCW shall have authority to adopt rules, on and after June 13, 2002, relating to determination of appropriate bargaining units within any agency. In making such determination the commission shall consider the duties, skills, and working conditions of the employees, the history of collective bargaining by the employees and their bargaining representatives, the extent of organization among the employees, and the desires of the employees. The public employment relations commission created in chapter 41.58 RCW shall adopt rules and make determinations relating to the certification and decertification of exclusive bargaining representatives.

(2) Each and every provision of RCW 41.56.140 through 41.56.160 shall be applicable to this chapter as it relates to state civil service employees.

(3) A collective bargaining agreement entered into under RCW 41.06.150 before July 1, 2004, covering employees subject to RCW 41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130 that expires after July 1, 2004, shall remain in full force during its duration, or until superseded by a collective bargaining agreement entered into by the parties under RCW 41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130. However, an agreement entered into before July 1, 2004, may not be renewed or extended beyond July 1, 2005, or until superseded by a collective bargaining agreement entered into under RCW 41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130, whichever is later.

[ 2002 c 354 s 232; 1993 c 281 s 35; 1969 ex.s. c 215 s 13.]

NOTES:

Short title—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907.

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.